Illinois, session 104th, HB5162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527A-9 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9)7    Sec. 27A-9. Term of charter; renewal. 8    (a) An initial charter shall be granted for a period of 5 9school years. A charter may be renewed in incremental periods 10not to exceed 10 school years. Authorizers shall ensure that 11every charter granted on or after January 1, 2017 includes 12standards and goals for academic, organizational, and 13financial performance. A charter must meet all standards and 14goals for academic, organizational, and financial performance 15set forth by the authorizer in order to be renewed for a term 16in excess of 5 years but not more than 10 years. If an 17authorizer fails to establish standards and goals, a charter 18shall not be renewed for a term in excess of 5 years. Nothing 19contained in this Section shall require an authorizer to grant 20a full 10-year renewal term to any particular charter school, 21but an authorizer may award a full 10-year renewal term to 22charter schools that have a demonstrated track record of 23improving student performance.   HB5162- 2 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1    (b) A charter school renewal proposal submitted to the 2local school board or the State Board, as the chartering 3entity, shall contain:4        (1) a report on the progress of the charter school in 5    achieving the goals, objectives, pupil performance 6    standards, content standards, and other terms of the 7    initial approved charter proposal; and8        (2) a financial statement that discloses the costs of 9    administration, instruction, and other spending categories 10    for the charter school that is understandable to the 11    general public and that will allow comparison of those 12    costs to other schools or other comparable organizations, 13    in a format required by the State Board.14    (c) A charter may be revoked or not renewed if the local 15school board or the State Board, as the chartering entity, 16clearly demonstrates that the charter school did any of the 17following, or otherwise failed to comply with the requirements 18of this law:19        (1) Committed a material violation of any of the 20    conditions, standards, or procedures set forth in the 21    charter.22        (2) Failed to meet or make reasonable progress toward 23    achievement of the content standards or pupil performance 24    standards identified in the charter.25        (3) Failed to meet generally accepted standards of 26    fiscal management.  HB5162- 3 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1        (4) Violated any provision of law from which the 2    charter school was not exempted.3        (5) Failed to adequately address racial, 4    socioeconomic, or educational disparities between the 5    school district and the charter school. 6        (6) Failed to align the charter mission and vision to 7    the local school board's mission and vision. 8    In the case of revocation, the local school board or the 9State Board, as the chartering entity, shall notify the 10charter school in writing of the reason why the charter is 11subject to revocation. The charter school shall submit a 12written plan to the local school board or the State Board, 13whichever is applicable, to rectify the problem. The plan 14shall include a timeline for implementation, which shall not 15exceed 2 years or the date of the charter's expiration, 16whichever is earlier. If the local school board or the State 17Board, as the chartering entity, finds that the charter school 18has failed to implement the plan of remediation and adhere to 19the timeline, then the chartering entity shall revoke the 20charter. Except in situations of an emergency where the 21health, safety, or education of the charter school's students 22is at risk, the revocation shall take place at the end of a 23school year. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 24prohibit an implementation timetable that is less than 2 years 25in duration. No local school board may arbitrarily or 26capriciously revoke or not renew a charter. Except for   HB5162- 4 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1extenuating circumstances outlined in this Section, if a local 2school board revokes or does not renew a charter, it must 3ensure that all students currently enrolled in the charter 4school are placed in schools that are higher performing than 5that charter school, as defined in the State's federal Every 6Student Succeeds Act accountability plan. In determining 7whether extenuating circumstances exist, a local school board 8must detail, by clear and convincing evidence, that factors 9unrelated to the charter school's accountability designation 10outweigh the charter school's academic performance. 11    (d) (Blank).12    (e) Notice of a local school board's decision to deny, 13revoke, or not renew a charter shall be provided to the State 14Board. 15    The State Board may reverse a local board's decision to 16revoke or not renew a charter if the State Board finds that the 17charter school or charter school proposal (i) is in compliance 18with this Article and (ii) is in the best interests of the 19students it is designed to serve. The State Board may 20condition the granting of an appeal on the acceptance by the 21charter school of funding in an amount less than that 22requested in the proposal submitted to the local school board. 23The State Board must appoint and utilize a hearing officer for 24any appeals conducted under this subsection. Final decisions 25of the State Board are subject to judicial review under the 26Administrative Review Law.   HB5162- 5 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1    (f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, if 2the State Board on appeal reverses a local board's decision or 3if a charter school is approved by referendum, the State Board 4shall act as the authorized chartering entity for the charter 5school and shall perform all functions under this Article 6otherwise performed by the local school board. The State Board 7shall report the aggregate number of charter school pupils 8resident in a school district to that district and shall 9notify the district of the amount of funding to be paid by the 10State Board to the charter school enrolling such students. The 11charter school shall maintain accurate records of daily 12attendance and student enrollment and shall enter data on the 13students served, their characteristics, their particular 14needs, the programs in which they participate, and their 15academic achievement into the statewide student information 16system established by the State Board. The State Board shall 17withhold from funds otherwise due the district the funds 18authorized by this Article to be paid to the charter school and 19shall pay such amounts to the charter school in quarterly 20installments, calculated as follows:21        (1) The amount of the first quarterly payment shall be 22    based on the projected number of students who will be 23    enrolled in the charter school in the upcoming school 24    year, multiplied by one-fourth of the resident district's 25    per capita tuition amount. Each charter school shall 26    submit its projected enrollment by no later than August 1   HB5162- 6 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1    of each year on a form provided by the State Board for this 2    purpose.3        (2) The amount of the second quarterly payment shall 4    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the first 5    and second quarterly installments is equal to the number 6    of students reported as enrolled at the charter school on 7    October 1 in the State Board's student information system, 8    multiplied by one-half of the resident district's per 9    capita tuition amount.10        (3) The amount of the third quarterly payment shall be 11    based on the number of students enrolled in the charter 12    school on January 1, multiplied by one-fourth of the 13    resident district's per capita tuition amount. Each 14    charter school shall submit its January 1 enrollment by no 15    later than January 5 of each year on a form provided by the 16    State Board for this purpose. 17        (4) The amount of the fourth quarterly payment shall 18    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the third 19    and fourth installments is equal to the number of students 20    reported as enrolled at the charter school on March 1 in 21    the State Board's student information system, multiplied 22    by one-half of the resident district's per capita tuition 23    amount. 24    (g) (Blank).25    (h) The State Board shall pay directly to a charter school 26it authorizes any federal or State funding attributable to a   HB5162- 7 -LRB104 17854 LNS 31288 b1student with a disability attending the school. 2(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.